resources/dictionaries/en-GB/en-GB.aff
FLAG num
SFX 17 N 1
SFX 17 y ies y 2028
SFX 26 N 1
SFX 26 0 e . 2028
SFX 129 N 1
SFX 129 a or a 2028
SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 y in y 2033
SFX 77 N 1
SFX 77 0 ser . 2035
SFX 85 N 1
SFX 85 x ces's x 2031
SFX 40 N 1
SFX 40 0 sing . 2037
SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 e ia e 2028
SFX 3 N 1
SFX 3 0 s . 2028
SFX 80 N 1
SFX 80 o i's o 2031
SFX 62 N 1
SFX 62 0 ning . 2037
SFX 55 N 1
SFX 55 0 ped . 2033
SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 0 nest . 2029
SFX 29 N 1
SFX 29 y ier y 2035
SFX 68 N 1
SFX 68 f ves's f 2031
SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 0 rest . 2029
SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 0 der . 2035
SFX 86 N 1
SFX 86 0 st . 2033
SFX 53 N 1
SFX 53 0 ler . 2035
SFX 48 N 1
SFX 48 o i o 2028
SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 0 thest . 2029
SFX 84 N 1
SFX 84 0 ter . 2035
SFX 33 N 1
SFX 33 0 x . 2028
SFX 24 N 1
SFX 24 0 er . 2035
SFX 51 N 1
SFX 51 s ntes s 2028
SFX 95 N 1
SFX 95 x ges x 2028
SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 y own y 2033
SFX 59 N 1
SFX 59 e 0 e 2033
SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 a ur a 2028
SFX 92 N 1
SFX 92 0 lier . 2035
SFX 66 N 1
SFX 66 0 ding . 2037
SFX 71 N 1
SFX 71 0 bed . 2033
SFX 64 N 1
SFX 64 0 x's . 2031
SFX 16 N 1
SFX 16 0 ring . 2037
SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 0 dest . 2029
SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 e iest e 2029
SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 0 es's . 2031
SFX 15 N 1
SFX 15 0 red . 2033
SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 0 th . 2028
SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 e ia's e 2031
SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 0 zed . 2033
SFX 42 N 1
SFX 42 0 ming . 2037
SFX 1 N 1
SFX 1 0 's . 2042
SFX 82 N 1
SFX 82 0 mest . 2029
SFX 93 N 1
SFX 93 0 liest . 2029
SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 0 ving . 2037
SFX 81 N 1
SFX 81 0 mer . 2035
SFX 98 N 1
SFX 98 0 ner . 2035
SFX 2 N 1
SFX 2 0 's . 2030
SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 o ines o 2028
SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 y ew y 2033
SFX 36 N 1
SFX 36 y iness y 2041
SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 0 er . 2028
SFX 27 N 1
SFX 27 y ied y 2033
SFX 20 N 1
SFX 20 0 ness's . 2032
SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 0 th . 2033
SFX 8 N 1
SFX 8 0 d . 2033
SFX 46 N 1
SFX 46 0 ked . 2033
SFX 23 N 1
SFX 23 e y e 2039
SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 e d e 2033
SFX 38 N 1
SFX 38 0 sed . 2033
SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 0 ist . 2029
SFX 5 N 1
SFX 5 0 ed . 2033
SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 0 ther . 2035
SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 a e a 2028
SFX 50 N 1
SFX 50 s des s 2028
SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 0 ne . 2033
SFX 44 N 1
SFX 44 0 ling . 2037
SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 0 zing . 2037

AF 1 # 1
AF 2,3 # 2
AF 2 # 5
AF 8,7,9 # 6
AF 2,17 # 13
AF 10,18,19,20 # 14
AF 23 # 17
AF 10,18,20 # 18
AF 26,2,3 # 22
AF 10,18,19,20,21,22 # 27
AF 2,3,5,6,7 # 29
AF 6,27,28 # 34
AF 18,20,23 # 35
AF 29,30 # 37
AF 2,3,8,6,7 # 57
AF 29,30,34,35,36 # 66
AF 29,30,37,34,35,36 # 67
AF 26,2 # 70
AF 2,3,24,5,6,7 # 71
AF 2,17,6,27,28 # 77
AF 2,3,41,42,7 # 78
AF 2,3,46,47,7 # 84
AF 2,3,48 # 85
AF 2,3,43,44,7 # 86
AF 2,50 # 96
AF 38,39,40 # 97
AF 4,2,51 # 98
AF 53,54,10,18,19,20 # 106
AF 2,3,55,56,7 # 110
AF 7,59,9 # 112
AF 17,29,30,37,34,35,36 # 113
AF 2,3,61,62,7 # 116
AF 2,33 # 117
AF 53,54,10 # 119
AF 15,16,7,2,3 # 120
AF 55,56,7 # 122
AF 2,3,33,64,7 # 130
AF 2,3,65,66,7 # 131
AF 2,3,67,68,5,6,7 # 133
AF 2,3,43,44,7,53 # 148
AF 4,2,12,5,11,6,38,39,40 # 151
AF 2,3,71,60,7 # 152
AF 3,7,59,9,75 # 156
AF 3,71,60,7 # 158
AF 24,3,5,6,7 # 167
AF 2,3,41,42,7,81,82 # 200
AF 2,3,33 # 201
AF 18,29,30,37,34,35,36,6,27,28 # 204
AF 24,4 # 206
AF 2,67,68 # 210
AF 4,2,85 # 213
AF 2,3,61,62,7,86 # 215
AF 11,38,39,40,4,2,12 # 218
AF 15,16,7,3 # 227
AF 24,25,92,93,10,18,19,20,3,5,6,7 # 241
AF 4,2,50 # 242
AF 2,95 # 245
AF 18,20,23,3 # 250
AF 2,3,61,62,7,98 # 255
AF 10,18,19,20,21,2,3,8,7,9 # 257
AF 3,41,42,7 # 271
AF 2,3,5,6,7,92,93,10 # 274
AF 2,3,25,84,7,14 # 278
AF 24,25 # 280
AF 5,11,6,38,39,40 # 285
AF 38,40 # 286
AF 10,81,82,18,19,20,41,42,7 # 299
AF 11,6,102,86,103,3 # 306
AF 3,61,62,7,98,106 # 319
AF 3,53,54,10,18,19,20 # 333
AF 24,92,93,10 # 337
AF 108,109 # 342
AF 10,18,19,20,84,94,2,3,7,13,14 # 344
AF 6,7,113 # 356
AF 6,116,28,117 # 362
AF 11,6,102 # 366
AF 2,3,7,59,9,75 # 375
AF 3,65,66,7 # 379
AF 2,48 # 395
AF 10,81,82,18,19,20 # 396
AF 11,6,102,24,4,2 # 397
AF 10,2,3,43,44,7 # 402
AF 2,3,41,42,7,81 # 411
AF 2,3,8,7,9,92,93,10,21 # 419
AF 2,3,122 # 427
AF 3,92,10,98 # 428
AF 24,25,92,93,10,18,19,20,3 # 446
AF 2,129,130 # 448
AF 132,2 # 464
AF 3,8,7,9,92,93,10,18,19,20,21,22 # 465
AF 2,133 # 466
AF 84 # 467
AF 8,7,9,92,93,10,18,20,21,22 # 468
AF 2,3,48,80,6,7 # 470
