resources/dictionaries/en-GB/en-GB.dic
amphora/70	1
atlas/98	1
attractant/2	1
avidity/13	1
backslide/112	1
baleful/106	1
bandeau/117	1
baneful/119	1
Barclay/1
beau/130	1
beef/133	1
bevel/148	1
bias/151	1
bijou/117	1
billet/29	1
birdie/57	1
biscuit/2	1
bite/156	1
blameless/14	1
blanket/71	1
bloc/84	1
blur/120	1
body/77	1
bowel/86	1
bras/97	1
breeder/2	1
Bromwich/1
bud/131	1
bum/200	1
bureau/201	1
bursa/70	1
busy/204	1
butch/206	1
cab/152	1
calf/210	1
calyx/213	1
can/215	286
careful/106	1
cares/97	1
catchy/37	1
certainty/13	1
chap/110	1
chapeau/201	1
charcoal/29	1
chisel/86	1
chum/78	334
clod/131	1
co/1
coccyx/245	1
cochlea/22	1
commander/2	1
communicable/17	1
company/77	1
con/255	1
concerto/85	1
concrete/257	1
confab/152	1
congruous/18	1
copyright/71	1
craggy/66	1
crater/29	1
creepy/113	1
crick/29	1
crop/110	1
crossbar/120	1
crumb/274	1
cut/278	1
dab/158	1
Darcy/1
dark/241	1
defocus/285	1
degas/286	1
deify/34	1
demur/227	1
den/116	1
deregulate/6	1
dermatitis/242	1
desert/71	1
devil/86	1
diaphanous/18	1
dim/299	1
dippy/37	1
discus/218	1
do/306	525
dowry/13	1
dread/167	1
drowsy/67	1
dun/319	1
durable/250	1
ecology/13	1
edify/34	1
enamel/86	1
enteritis/242	1
envisage/6	1
equip/122	1
evil/333	1
exaltation/2	1
f/337	1
false/27	1
fan/116	1
far/342	608
fat/344	1
fey/280	1
fibula/70	1
flee/356	1
fluffy/66	1
fly/362	1
fob/152	1
focus/151	656
fool/29	1
foolery/13	1
forego/366	668
forgo/366	687
Fort-de-France/1
freckly/37	1
frenzy/77	1
frostbite/375	1
fur/120	1
gad/379	1
gardening/5	1
garlic/84	1
gastroenteritis/96	1
gateau/201	1
glissando/395	1
glum/396	1
go/397	758
graceful/106	1
graffito/395	1
granulate/6	1
grasping/18	1
gravel/402	1
grim/396	1
group/71	1
gum/78	1
gun/116	1
half/210	1
ham/411	1
havoc/84	1
healthy/67	1
hedgehop/122	1
hepatitis/96	1
highlighter/2	1
hob/152	1
holograph/29	1
home/419	1
hoof/133	1
hungry/67	1
hydrometry/13	1
Hyundai/1
imago/427	1
impassable/35	1
imply/34	1
in/428	1
inattentive/14	1
incurable/250	1
inhospitable/35	1
insanity/13	1
instep/2	1
intermezzo/85	1
irreproachable/35	1
irresolute/14	1
irritate/6	1
jar/120	1
job/152	1
joyful/106	1
kind/446	1
krona/448	1
lam/271	1
lamina/70	1
laryngitis/96	1
larynx/245	1
leaf/133	1
libretto/85	1
lied/464	1
like/465	1
lira/466	1
lit/467	1
live/468	1
loaf/133	1
loco/470	1
low/241	1
Lumpur/1
magistracy/13	1
mas/97	1
midstream/5	1
milieu/201	1
miraculous/18	1
mos/97	1
mum/411	1168
musty/67	1
myelitis/96	1
nebula/22	1
neuritis/96	1
nod/131	1
Orville/1
overfly/362	1
overlap/110	1
oversimplify/34	1
pan/116	1
panic/84	1
parterre/2	1
pas/97	1
penumbra/22	1
perceptible/17	1
perusal/2	1
pharyngitis/96	1
pharynx/245	1
picnic/84	1
piquancy/13	1
pleura/70	1
plod/379	1
plummy/37	1
poliomyelitis/96	1
politicize/6	1
portmanteau/201	1
pub/152	1
quip/110	1
ram/78	1
return/167	1
rhymer/2	1
scar/120	1
scherzo/85	1
scraggly/37	1
Scranton/1
seductive/18	1
sham/411	1
ship/110	1
signal/402	1
skid/379	1
skim/411	1
snoopy/37	1
squib/152	1
steam/71	1
stem/78	1
stratify/34	1
stria/70	1
stud/131	1
tableau/117	1
tan/255	1
tempo/85	1
title-deed/1
toast/29	1
traffic/84	1
trichina/70	1
undergo/366	1891
veritable/17	1
vocabulary/13	1
wham/78	1
widower/2	1
zip/110	1
